California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(b) The department shall not approve the importation of, or renew a permit to import, any anadromous fish or roe thereof listed in Section 2118 or the regulations adopted under Section 2118 into the Smith River watershed by a person unless that person had a permit or authorization approved before February 22, 1988. However, the department may issue or renew a permit for the importation of any anadromous fish or roe thereof specifically for research purposes conducted at any university, college, governmental research agency, or other bona fide scientific institution, as determined by the department, engaging in scientific or public health research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1467, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

15601.

A written application for the importation of a live aquatic plant or animal that is submitted in conformance with the procedural requirements established by the commission is deemed to be approved if it has not been denied within 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 225.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15604.

No facility constructed for the purpose of spawning, incubating, or raising of anadromous fish listed in Section 2118 in the Smith River watershed is exempt from any provision of the California Environmental Quality Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1467, Sec. 5.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

15605.

(a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the importation of Atlantic Salmon or the roe thereof, or the continued possession of Atlantic salmon or the roe therefrom which were lawfully imported or possessed on or before February 22, 1988, in the Smith River watershed under a written approval of the department issued pursuant to Section 15600.

(b) Nothing in this chapter applies to the importation or possession of dead Atlantic salmon or nonviable roe therefrom imported for human consumption if the importer has the appropriate licenses issued by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1467, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Aquaculture Development Committee [15700. - 15703.]

15700.

The director shall appoint an Aquaculture Development Committee consisting of the following persons:

(a) At least 12 members representing all sectors of the fresh and salt water aquaculture industry.

(b) One member representing the department, two members from and chosen by the University of California, one with expertise in aquaculture science and one with expertise in outreach to the fisheries community, and one member each from and chosen by the Department of Food and Agriculture, the California Coastal Commission, the State Lands Commission, the State Water Resources Control Board, the State Department of Public Health, and the Joint Legislative Committee on Fisheries and
 Aquaculture. The member of the committee appointed by the Joint Legislative Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture shall meet and, except as otherwise provided by the California Constitution, advise the committee to the extent that this advisory participation is not incompatible with their position as a Member of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 226.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15701.

(a) The term of membership for members other than representatives of public agencies shall be three years. The representatives of public agencies shall serve at the pleasure of the agency that the member represents.

(b) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

15702.

(a) The committee shall be advisory to the director on all matters pertaining to aquaculture and shall coordinate activities among public entities.

(b) The committee shall assist the director in developing and implementing a state aquaculture plan, identify the opportunities for regulatory relief, assist in development of research and development priorities, assist in the development of criteria to assure that publicly financed pilot programs are compatible with industry needs, and identify other opportunities for industrial development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 172, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

15703.

The committee shall meet on the call of the director, but not less than twice each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. STATE-TRIBAL AGREEMENTS GOVERNING INDIAN FISHING [16000. - 16011.]



CHAPTER 1. Legislative Findings [16000. - 16000.]

16000.

The Legislature finds:

(a) Jurisdiction over the protection and development of natural resources, especially the fish resource, is of great importance to both the State of California and California Indian tribes.

(b) To California Indian tribes, control over their minerals, lands, water, wildlife, and other resources is crucial to their economic self-sufficiency and the preservation of their heritage. On the other hand, the State of California is concerned about protecting and developing its resources; protecting, restoring, and developing its commercial and recreational salmon fisheries; ensuring public access to its waterways; and protecting the environment within its borders.

(c) More than any other issue confronting the State of California and California Indian tribes, the regulation of natural resources, especially fish, transcends political boundaries.

(d) In many cases, the State of California and California Indian tribes have differed in their respective views of the nature and extent of state versus tribal jurisdiction in areas where Indians have historically fished. Despite these frequent and often bitter disputes, both the state and the tribes seek, as their mutual goal, the protection and preservation of the fish resource. This division is an attempt to provide a legal mechanism, other than protracted and expensive litigation over unresolved legal issues, for achieving that mutual goal.

(e) This division creates a pilot project that will involve and encourage the efforts of the State of California and the Covelo Indian Community of the Round Valley Indian Reservation to reach a mutual agreement regarding the legal framework for the exercise of Indian subsistence fishing in the boundary streams of the historic 1873 Round Valley Indian Reservation. It is hoped that this pilot project, if successful, will provide the incentive for enactment of broader legislation that would authorize similar negotiated agreements with other California Indian tribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [16001. - 16005.]

16001.

The definition in this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

“Covelo Indian Community” means the confederated tribes of the Round Valley Indian Reservation located in Mendocino County, California, recognized as an Indian tribe by the Secretary of the Interior.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

“Take” means pursue, catch, capture, or kill, or attempt to pursue, catch, capture, or kill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

“Traditional Indian fishing practice” means a mode, method, or way of taking fish that is recognized in the customs and traditions of the Covelo Indian Community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

“Historic 1873 Round Valley Indian Reservation” means the reservation described and set aside by Congress for the Covelo Indian Community in the Act of March 3, 1873 (17 Stat. 633).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Negotiation and Approval of Agreement [16006. - 16009.]

16006.

Subject to the approval of the commission, the department may enter into a mutual agreement or compact with the Covelo Indian Community respecting jurisdiction and authority to regulate traditional Indian subsistence fishing practices in the boundary streams of the historic 1873 Round Valley Indian Reservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16007.

Any agreement or compact entered into pursuant to Section 16006 shall be submitted by the department to the commission for review and approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16008.

Any agreement or compact entered into pursuant to Section 16006 shall not be effective until they are approved by the commission. The commission may consider and approve an agreement or compact at any of its regular or special meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16009.

The commission shall give notice of the time and place of any meeting at which the approval of an agreement or compact entered into under this division will be considered by publishing prior notice in any publication issued by the Resources Agency or the department after determining the time and place of the meeting. The commission shall make copies of the proposed agreement or compact available to the public on request and the notice shall contain a statement to that effect. All meetings required by this section shall be open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Enforceability of an Agreement or Compact [16010. - 16011.]

16010.

Any agreement or compact entered into pursuant to this division shall be enforceable by the parties only to the extent and in the forum or forums provided for under the terms of the agreement or compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16011.

The department may promulgate regulations consistent with the provisions of any agreement or compact entered into pursuant to Section 16006. The application and enforcement of those regulations shall be in accordance with the express provisions of the agreement or compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13.5. STATE-TRIBAL AGREEMENTS GOVERNING INDIAN FISHING ON THE KLAMATH RIVER [16500. - 16541.]



CHAPTER 1. Legislative Findings [16500. - 16500.]

16500.

The Legislature finds:

(a) Jurisdiction over the protection and development of natural resources, especially the fish resource, is of great importance to both the State of California and California Indian tribes.

(b) To California Indian tribes, control over their minerals, lands, water, wildlife, and other resources within Indian country is crucial to their economic self-sufficiency and the preservation of their heritage. On the other hand, the State of California is concerned about protecting and developing its resources; protecting, restoring, and developing its commercial and recreational salmon fisheries; ensuring public access to its
 waterways; and protecting the environment within its borders.

(c) More than any other issue confronting the State of California and California Indian tribes, the regulation of natural resources, especially fish, transcends political boundaries.

(d) In many cases, the State of California and California Indian tribes have differed in their respective views of the nature and extent of state versus tribal jurisdiction in areas where Indians have historically fished. Despite these frequent and often bitter disputes, both the state and the tribes seek, as their mutual goal, the protection and preservation of the fish resource. This division is an attempt to provide a legal mechanism, other than protracted and expensive litigation over unresolved legal issues, for achieving that mutual goal on the Klamath River.

(e) The
 department has exercised jurisdiction over the Klamath River from the mouth of the river through the Yurok Reservation and the Hoopa Valley Reservation, but the Bureau of Indian Affairs and the Indian tribes thereon have also asserted jurisdiction over that river. The river itself lies within a disputed area and proper management of the resource presents, therefore, unique and difficult problems in the exercise of fishing practices by all user groups.

(f) Although commercial fishing may not be a traditional practice of the tribes existing along the Klamath River within the boundaries of the land of the Yurok Reservation and the Hoopa Valley Reservation, nevertheless, the department has historically supported the concept of tribal fishing, including a tribal commercial fishing industry where the industry is consistent with the need to preserve the species, sound management, and where that usage would not adversely effect other user groups,
 including sportfishing and the ocean commercial fishery.

(g) A commercial fishery existed on the Klamath River in the late 19th century and early 20th century, in which the Indian tribes existing along the river participated, but commercial fishing was abolished in 1933 with the passage of the predecessor to Section 8434, and, further, that salmon resources have declined historically due to past water developmental policies and timber harvesting practices. With a reduced number of fish available, special laws are needed to protect those resources and allocate them fairly among the various user groups.

(h) This division is not only enacted to provide the legal mechanism described above, but is also intended to encourage cooperative agreements to allow protection of the resource among all of the user groups. In so doing, the Legislature recognizes the unique status of the Klamath
 River and the fishing therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 117.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. General Provisions and Definitions [16510. - 16520.]

16510.

The definition in this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16511.

“Klamath River Indian Tribes” means those tribes existing within the boundaries of the Yurok Reservation and the Hoopa Valley Reservation, located in Humboldt and Del Norte Counties in California, which tribes are recognized as Indian tribes by the Secretary of the Interior.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1633, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

16512.

“Take” means pursue, catch, capture, or kill, or attempt to pursue, catch, capture, or kill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16513.

“Traditional Indian fishing practice” means a mode, method, or way of taking fish that is recognized in the customs and traditions of the Klamath River Indian Tribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16514.

“Yurok Reservation” means the land extending one mile in width on each side of the Klamath River from the mouth of the Klamath River to the confluence of the Trinity and Klamath Rivers. “Hoopa Valley Reservations” means those lands lying within the Hoopa Square.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1633, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

16515.

“Disputed area” means that part of the Klamath River or Trinity River where jurisdiction to regulate Indian fishing is asserted by both the State of California and by one or more of the Indian tribes in the Klamath River Indian Tribes or by the United States government acting as trustee therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16516.

“Subsistence purposes” means fish or game taken by qualified Indian tribal members of the Klamath River Indian Tribes for personal consumption by the tribal members or their immediate families.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16517.

“Ceremonial or religious purposes” means fish taken by qualified Indian tribal members of the Klamath River Indian Tribes for recognized religious or ceremonial activities, which activities are consistent with the customs and traditions of the particular tribe in the Klamath River Indian Tribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16518.

“Commercial fishing” means the taking of fish by qualified Indian tribal members of the Klamath River Indian Tribes, for sale or to be offered for sale within California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16520.

“Klamath Fishery Management Council” means that council created pursuant to Section 460ss–2 of Title 16 of the United States Code that is composed of one representative each from the department, the Pacific Fishery Management Council, National Marine Fisheries Service, Department of the Interior, Oregon Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Hoopa Valley Business Council, non-Hoopa Indians, the California commercial salmon fishing industry, the Oregon commercial salmon fishing industry, the Klamath River in-river sportfishing community, and the California offshore recreational fishing industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 118.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Negotiation and Approval of Agreement [16530. - 16532.]

16530.

The director may enter into a mutual agreement or compact with the Hoopa Valley Business Council regarding the taking of fish from the Trinity River within the exterior boundaries of the Hoopa Valley Reservation or with the Yurok Tribe, or the Bureau of Indian Affairs acting as trustee for the Yurok Indians, regarding the taking of fish from the Klamath River within the exterior boundaries of the Yurok Reservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1633, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

16531.

Negotiations shall take place following the completion each year of the salmon allocation agreement recommended by the Klamath Fishery Management Council, and subsequently adopted by the Pacific Fishery Management Council and the United States Department of Commerce. Any agreement or compact under this division shall reflect those allocations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1422, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

16532.

Notwithstanding Sections 8434, 8685.5, 8685.6, and 8685.7, the compact or agreement may include provisions for commercial sales of salmon allocated to qualified Indian members of the Klamath River Indian Tribes and that the salmon may be taken by traditional Indian methods, including, but not limited to, use of gill nets, if the agreement or compact includes provisions for all of the following:

(a) Separating the salmon taken for commercial purposes from the salmon taken for subsistence use, which may include tagging or marking of the salmon to be sold.

(b) Limiting the number of the salmon to be sold.

(c) A portion of the sales to benefit the members or programs of the Klamath River Indian Tribes in accordance with the wishes of the tribes or the Bureau of Indian Affairs acting on behalf of the tribes as trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1422, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Enforceability of an Agreement or Compact [16540. - 16541.]

16540.

Any agreement or compact entered into pursuant to this division shall be enforceable by the parties only to the extent and in the form or forms provided for under the terms of the agreement or compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16541.

The department may adopt regulations consistent with the provisions of any agreement or compact entered into pursuant to Section 16530 or 16531. The application and enforcement of those regulations shall be in accordance with the express provisions of the agreement or compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

